Utah statutes.
17-43-201.   Local substance abuse authorities -- Responsibilities.
(1) (a) (i)  In each county operating under a county executive-council form of
government under Section 17-52-504, the county legislative body is the local
substance abuse authority, provided however that any contract for plan
services shall be administered by the county executive.
(ii)  In each county operating under a council-manager form of government
under Section 17-52-505, the county manager is the local substance abuse
authority.
(iii)  In each county other than a county described in Subsection (1)(a)(i) or
(ii), the county legislative body is the local substance abuse authority.
(b)  Within legislative appropriations and county matching funds required by
this section, and under the direction of the division, each local substance
abuse authority shall:
(i)  develop substance abuse prevention and treatment services plans; and
(ii)  provide substance abuse services to residents of the county.
(2) (a)  By executing an interlocal agreement under Title 11, Chapter 13,
Interlocal Cooperation Act, two or more counties may join to provide substance
abuse prevention and treatment services.
(b)  The legislative bodies of counties joining to provide services may
establish acceptable ways of apportioning the cost of substance abuse
services.
(c)  Each agreement for joint substance abuse services shall:
(i) (A)  designate the treasurer of one of the participating counties or
another person as the treasurer for the combined substance abuse authorities
and as the custodian of moneys available for the joint services; and
(B)  provide that the designated treasurer, or other disbursing officer
authorized by the treasurer, may make payments from the moneys for the joint
services upon audit of the appropriate auditing officer or officers
representing the participating counties;
(ii)  provide for the appointment of an independent auditor or a county
auditor of one of the participating counties as the designated auditing
officer for the combined substance abuse authorities;
(iii) (A)  provide for the appointment of the county or district attorney of
one of the participating counties as the designated legal officer for the
combined substance abuse authorities; and
(B)  authorize the designated legal officer to request and receive the
assistance of the county or district attorneys of the other participating
counties in defending or prosecuting actions within their counties relating to
the combined substance abuse authorities; and
(iv)  provide for the adoption of management, clinical, financial,
procurement, personnel, and administrative policies as already established by
one of the participating counties or as approved by the legislative body of
each participating county or interlocal board.
(d)  An agreement for joint substance abuse services may provide for joint
operation of services and facilities or for operation of services and
facilities under contract by one participating local substance abuse authority
for other participating local substance abuse authorities.
(3) (a)  Each local substance abuse authority is accountable to the
department, the Department of Health, and the state with regard to the use of
state and federal funds received from those departments for substance abuse
services, regardless of whether the services are provided by a private
contract provider.
(b)  Each local substance abuse authority shall comply, and require compliance
by its contract provider, with all directives issued by the department and the
Department of Health regarding the use and expenditure of state and federal
funds received from those departments for the purpose of providing substance
abuse programs and services.  The department and Department of Health shall
ensure that those directives are not duplicative or conflicting, and shall
consult and coordinate with local substance abuse authorities with regard to
programs and services.
(4)  Each local substance abuse authority shall:
(a)  review and evaluate substance abuse prevention and treatment needs and
services, including substance abuse needs and services for individuals
incarcerated in a county jail or other county correctional facility;
(b)  annually prepare and submit to the division a plan approved by the county
legislative body for funding and service delivery that includes:
(i)  provisions for services, either directly by the substance abuse authority
or by contract, for adults, youth, and children, including those incarcerated
in a county jail or other county correctional facility; and
(ii)  primary prevention, targeted prevention, early intervention, and
treatment services;
(c)  establish and maintain, either directly or by contract, programs licensed
under Title 62A, Chapter 2, Licensure of Programs and Facilities;
(d)  appoint directly or by contract a full or part time director for
substance abuse programs, and prescribe the director's duties;
(e)  provide input and comment on new and revised rules established by the
division;
(f)  establish and require contract providers to establish administrative,
clinical, procurement, personnel, financial, and management policies regarding
substance abuse services and facilities, in accordance with the rules of the
division, and state and federal law;
(g)  establish mechanisms allowing for direct citizen input;
(h)  annually contract with the division to provide substance abuse programs
and services in accordance with the provisions of Title 62A, Chapter 15,
Substance Abuse and Mental Health Act;
(i)  comply with all applicable state and federal statutes, policies, audit
requirements, contract requirements, and any directives resulting from those
audits and contract requirements;
(j)  promote or establish programs for the prevention of substance abuse
within the community setting through community-based prevention programs;
(k)  provide funding equal to at least 20% of the state funds that it receives
to fund services described in the plan;
(l)  comply with the requirements and procedures of Title 11, Chapter 13,
Interlocal Cooperation Act, Title 17B, Chapter 1, Part 6, Fiscal Procedures
for Local Districts, and Title 51, Chapter 2a, Accounting Reports from
Political Subdivisions, Interlocal Organizations, and Other Local Entities
Act;
(m)  for persons convicted of driving under the influence in violation of
Section 41-6a-502 or 41-6a-517, conduct the following as defined in Section
41-6a-501:
(i)  a screening;
(ii)  an assessment;
(iii)  an educational series; and
(iv)  substance abuse treatment; and
(n)  utilize proceeds of the accounts described in Subsection 62A-15-503(1) to
supplement the cost of providing the services described in Subsection (4)(m).
(5)  Before disbursing any public funds, each local substance abuse authority
shall require that each entity that receives any public funds from the local
substance abuse authority agrees in writing that:
(a)  the entity's financial records and other records relevant to the entity's
performance of the services provided to the local substance abuse authority
shall be subject to examination by:
(i)  the division;
(ii)  the local substance abuse authority director;
(iii) (A)  the county treasurer and county or district attorney; or
(B)  if two or more counties jointly provide substance abuse services under an
agreement under Subsection (2), the designated treasurer and the designated
legal officer;
(iv)  the county legislative body; and
(v)  in a county with a county executive that is separate from the county
legislative body, the county executive;
(b)  the county auditor may examine and audit the entity's financial and other
records relevant to the entity's performance of the services provided to the
local substance abuse authority; and
(c)  the entity will comply with the provisions of Subsection (3)(b).
(6)  A local substance abuse authority may receive property, grants, gifts,
supplies, materials, contributions, and any benefit derived therefrom, for
substance abuse services.  If those gifts are conditioned upon their use for a
specified service or program, they shall be so used.
(7) (a)  As used in this section, "public funds" means the same as that term
is defined in Section 17-43-203.
(b)  Public funds received for the provision of services pursuant to the local
substance abuse plan may not be used for any other purpose except those
authorized in the contract between the local substance abuse authority and the
provider for the provision of plan services.
(8)  Subject to the requirements of the federal Substance Abuse Prevention and
Treatment Block Grant, Public Law 102-321, a local substance abuse authority
shall ensure that all substance abuse treatment programs that receive public
funds:
(a)  accept and provide priority for admission to a pregnant woman or a
pregnant minor; and
(b)  if admission of a pregnant woman or a pregnant minor is not possible
within 24 hours of the time that a request for admission is made, provide a
comprehensive referral for interim services that:
(i)  are accessible to the pregnant woman or pregnant minor;
(ii)  are best suited to provide services to the pregnant woman or pregnant
minor;
(iii)  may include:
(A)  counseling;
(B)  case management; or
(C)  a support group; and
(iv)  shall include a referral for:
(A)  prenatal care; and
(B)  counseling on the effects of alcohol and drug use during pregnancy.
(9)  If a substance abuse treatment program described in Subsection (8) is not
able to accept and admit a pregnant woman or pregnant minor under Subsection
(8) within 48 hours of the time that request for admission is made, the local
substance abuse authority shall contact the Division of Substance Abuse and
Mental Health for assistance in providing services to the pregnant woman or
pregnant minor.
